California statutes. Education Code
Notwithstanding Section 69506, the Student Aid Commission may, whenever it is determined to be in the best interest of the state, develop and adopt regulations that modify the methodology set forth in federal law or regulation for determining the expected family contribution of students seeking any state-funded financial assistance or the federal definition for establishing the dependent and independent status of students seeking any state-funded financial assistance. It is the Legislature’s intent that these regulations promote consistency between federal and state standards, encourage the maximum contribution from parents while being sensitive to individual student financial and personal circumstances, and encourage a simple financial aid application process.

(a) The regulations developed pursuant to this section shall be adopted as Student Aid Commission regulations in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) Prior to adopting or amending regulations pursuant to this section, the commission shall conduct, and make public, a full analysis which includes at least an examination and explanation of the cost of the change, the effect on student applicant and recipient eligibility and award levels, and the effects of implementing the criteria on those programs administered by the commission.

(c) Not later than July 1 of the year following any modifications to the methodology for determining expected family contribution or the federal definition of student dependence or independence made pursuant to this section, the commission shall report to the Governor and the Legislature the impact of the changes on those programs administered by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 21, Sec. 36.   Effective March 7, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

69507.

In instances where an applicant does not meet the criteria specified in Section 69506, and the parents refuse to provide financial information, the student may not be considered for a grant. In those instances, however, the student may be considered for a loan or employment aid to the extent that such are available on the basis of the resources of the student and the student’s spouse, if any.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

69507.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no student shall receive a grant or fellowship administered by the Student Aid Commission if he or she has previously defaulted on any student loan, or has failed to repay a federal or state student grant where required to do so.

(b) If a student has made satisfactory arrangements to repay a default on a previous student loan, or to repay grant funds where required to do so, the student may be eligible to receive a grant or fellowship administered by the Student Aid Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1079, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

69508.

When federal regulations defining the financial independence of students are altered, the Student Aid Commission shall as soon as possible report to the Legislature on what changes are necessary to conform this article to federal standards.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1214.)
-------------------------------------------

69508.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a student who meets the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 68130.5, or who meets equivalent requirements adopted by the Regents of the University of California, is eligible to apply for, and participate in, any student financial aid program administered by the State of California to the full extent permitted by federal law. The Legislature finds and declares that this section is a state law within the meaning of Section 1621(d) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the Student Aid Commission shall establish procedures and forms that enable students who are exempt from paying nonresident tuition under Section 68130.5, or who meet equivalent requirements adopted by the regents, to apply
 for, and participate in, all student financial aid programs administered by the State of California to the full extent permitted by federal law.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that all forms of state-based aid in California be made equally available to students who are exempt, pursuant to Section 68130.5, from paying nonresident tuition and to all other students who qualify for state-based aid in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 53, Sec. 15.   (SB 77)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

69509.

(a) Upon the commencement of any cause of action, including an emergency action, by the commission against an educational institution in connection with the Federal Family Education Loan Program or other state student financial aid program, the director of the commission may order that all or any part of state financial aid funds scheduled to be delivered to that institution by the commission, whether payable to that institution or its students, be withheld from the institution and deposited in a separate state account. However, in order to alleviate the financial hardships imposed upon students by withholding the delivery of state financial aid funds to an educational institution, the director of the commission, at any time after the initial withholding, may release state financial aid funds to these students, giving first priority to the release of funds for subsistence payments.

(b) The director shall give notice to the institution and affected students of any action taken pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) The director, upon the termination of any action taken pursuant to subdivision (a), shall order the disposition of the withheld funds in a manner consistent with the outcome of the cause of action and in the best interest of the affected students. The director may order that the funds be withheld from an institution permanently, in which case those funds shall be returned to the state fund or account from which it originated, for subsequent use by the commission.

(d) “Cause of action” and “emergency action,” for the purposes of this section, mean those actions described in Sections 30302 and 30304 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, and as those sections may subsequently be amended, concerning the limitation, suspension, and termination of eligibility under the Federal Family Education Loan Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 63.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

69509.5.

(a) Within five days of the commencement of any cause of action, including an emergency action, by the commission against a private postsecondary educational institution in connection with the Federal Family Education Loan Program, the director of the commission shall give notice, in writing, of the commencement of the action to the Council for Private Postsecondary and Vocational Education.

(b) “Cause of action” and “emergency action” for the purposes of this section, mean those actions described in Sections 30302 and 30304 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, and as those sections may subsequently be amended, concerning the limitation, suspension, and termination of eligibility under the Federal Family Education Loan Program.

(c) The director of the commission, or his or her designee, shall give written notice to the Council for Private Postsecondary and Vocational Education when, in the administration of a program review concerning any private postsecondary educational institution’s participation in the Cal Grant Program or the Federal Family Education Loan Program, evidence indicates that a private postsecondary educational institution is in violation of the standards adopted by its responsible accrediting agency or when it is in violation of Section 94800, Sections 94811 to 94825, inclusive, or Section 94930.

(d) The director of the commission may develop selection criteria for the scheduled review of any private postsecondary or vocational educational institution.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1997.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 64) and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 64.5.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Section operative January 1, 1997, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

69509.6.

(a) Commencing with the 2018–19 award year, each higher education institution, except for the California Community Colleges, shall, to the extent that the institution receives a student borrower’s federal, state, and private education loan information, send an individualized letter, by regular mail or electronic mail, to that student that includes all of the following information:

(1) An estimate of all of the following:

(A) The total cumulative principal amount of his or her federal, state, and private education
 loans.

(B) The potential total payoff amount of his or her federal, state, and private education loans incurred or a range of the total payoff amount.

(C) Monthly repayment amounts that a similarly situated borrower may incur, including principal and interest, for the amount of loans the student has taken out at the time the information is provided, assuming a 10-year repayment plan under current federal loan interest rates.

(2) A statement that the estimates provided pursuant to paragraph (1) are general in nature and not meant as a guarantee or
 promise of the actual projected amounts, and that they are based on the loan amounts that the institution is aware of and may not include all student debt incurred; that borrowers with private loans may have substantially higher payments; and that federal student loan borrowers may be eligible for repayment plans that extend beyond ten years.

(3) Contact information for the institution’s financial aid office or a financial aid or academic adviser of the institution.

(b) An institution described in subdivision (a) shall not incur liability for any representations made in the estimates provided pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(c) If an institution is not able to provide a student with estimates pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the institution shall inform the student in the letter described in subdivision (a) that he or she may view his or her financial aid history by establishing a federal student aid account, or accessing his or her federal student aid account if established, through the National Student Loan Data System. The institution shall provide the student with the Internet Web site link to the system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 448, Sec. 1.   (AB 1178)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. The Student Aid Commission [69510. - 69519.3.]

69510.

The Student Aid Commission shall be composed of the following 15 members:

(a) One representative from public, proprietary, or nonprofit postsecondary schools located in California.

(b) One representative from a California independent college or university.

(c) One representative each from the University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges.

(d) Two members each of whom shall be a student enrolled in a California postsecondary educational institution at the time of appointment,
 and shall be enrolled in a California postsecondary educational institution for the duration of the term. A student member who graduates from an institution with no more than six months of the student member’s term remaining shall be permitted to serve for the remainder of the term.

(e) (1) Three public members. This paragraph shall become inoperative on the date that a public member’s term expires.

(2) Two public members and one member who has knowledge, expertise, or experience in accessing the educational benefits available to veterans of the Armed Forces of the United
 States. This paragraph shall become operative on the date that a public member’s term expires.

(f) One representative from a California secondary school.

(g) Two representatives appointed by the Senate Rules Committee.

(h) Two representatives appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 561, Sec. 1.   (AB 587)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

69511.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (b), each member of the commission, other than a student member and a member appointed pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 69510, shall have a four-year term. Members appointed pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 69510 shall serve at the pleasure of the Speaker of the Assembly.

(2) (A) A student member appointed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 69510 shall have a term
 of two academic years.

(B) Upon expiration of the student member’s two-year term, if the Governor has not appointed a successor, the student member may remain in office for one additional year or until the Governor appoints a successor, whichever occurs first. The requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 69510 do not apply to a student in the additional year under this paragraph.

(C) The commission shall notify the appropriate student organization for each segment, as described in Section 69511.5, of a pending student member vacancy no less than three months before the expiration of the term, and of the appropriate student organization’s opportunity to submit a list of nominees pursuant to Section 69511.5.

(b) The term of one member appointed pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section
 69510, effective January 1, 1991, shall be for five years. Each subsequent term for members appointed pursuant to this subdivision shall be for four years.

(c) At no time shall both student representatives be enrolled in the same segment of postsecondary education in California. For purposes of this subdivision, each postsecondary education program listed in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 69510 is a segment of postsecondary education in California.

(d) Appointment to the commission of members appointed pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, of Section 69510 shall be made by the Governor subject to confirmation by the Senate.

(e) Any vacancy shall be filled by the appointment of a person who will have the same status as the predecessor of the appointee.
 Except for appointees appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, the appointee shall hold office only for the balance of the unexpired term.

(f) (1) Each member of the commission shall receive a stipend of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day in which he or she attends any meeting of the commission or any meeting of any committee or subcommittee of the commission, of which committee or subcommittee he or she is a member, and which committee or subcommittee meeting is conducted for the purpose of carrying out the powers and duties of the commission. In addition, each member shall receive his or her actual and necessary traveling expenses incurred in the course of his or her duties.

(2) In addition, if a student member who attends a qualifying institution, as defined in Section 69432.7, is not the recipient of a Cal
 Grant award, the qualifying institution, as a condition of participation in the Cal Grant program, shall waive the student member’s tuition, up to the maximum award amount for that institution, for the duration of the student member’s term of office.

(g) (1) If an act of Congress establishes a program of scholarships or grants for undergraduate students and permits administration of the program within a state by a state agency, the Student Aid Commission, as established by Section 69510, shall administer the act within the state if the Governor and the Student Aid Commission, by a majority vote of its entire membership, determine that the participation by the state in the federal scholarship or grant program under the act would not interfere with or jeopardize the continuation of the scholarship program established under Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3.

(2) The commission shall constitute the state commission on federal scholarships or grants and is hereby empowered to formulate a plan for development and administration of any federal scholarship or grant program within the state.

(3) Subject to the provisions of this chapter, the commission is hereby vested with all necessary power and authority to cooperate with the government of the United States, or any agency or agencies thereof, in the administration of any act of Congress establishing a scholarship or grant program and the rules and regulations adopted thereunder.

(4) Before adopting a state plan, the commission, acting as the state commission on federal scholarships or grants, shall hold public hearings as provided in the California Administrative Procedure Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 43, Sec. 1.   (AB 1831)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

69511.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 69511, the Governor shall appoint each student member of the Student Aid Commission pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 69510 from the persons nominated in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (b).

(b) For each student member of the commission, the appropriate student organization may submit a list of nominees. The list shall specify not less than three and not more than five nominees. The appropriate student organization for each segment shall be a composite group of at least five representative student government associations, as determined by the commission.

(c) The student member appointed to the commission shall not be enrolled in the same segment as the outgoing student member or in the same segment of the other sitting student member.

(d) Participating student organizations designated in subdivision (b) shall inform students within their respective segment of pending student vacancies on the commission.

(e) The person appointed as a student member of the Student Aid Commission pursuant to this section shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate as required in subdivision (d) of Section 69511.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1573, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

69512.

The members of the commission shall annually select a chairperson from the members of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1379, Sec. 1.   Effective October 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

69513.

The commission shall appoint a director who shall be the chief executive officer for the commission and who shall serve at the pleasure of the commission. The Legislature hereby requests the commission to designate that executive officer as the person holding the position confidential to it, within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 4 of Article VII of the Constitution.

The commission may employ other employees as it deems necessary to carry out its functions under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 8, Sec. 18.   Effective April 15, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

69513.1.

The commission may delegate to the director any power, duty, purpose, function, or jurisdiction that the commission may lawfully delegate, including the authority to enter into and sign contracts on behalf of the commission. The director may redelegate any of those powers, duties, purposes, functions, or jurisdictions to his or her designee, unless by statute, or rule or regulation, the director is expressly required to act personally.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 482, Sec. 2.   Effective August 14, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

69513.2.

Notwithstanding any other law:

(a) The commission shall grant up to an additional 30 calendar days beyond an application deadline for any financial aid program administered by the commission pursuant to this part if the commission receives and approves a formal request to postpone the application deadline from either the superintendent of a school district or community college district or from the president or chancellor of a California institution of higher education that is eligible to receive state funds for student financial assistance and the commission finds that a qualifying event, as defined in subdivision (e), has occurred.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the commission may grant up to an additional 30
 calendar days beyond an application deadline for any financial aid program administered by the commission pursuant to this part if the commission finds that a qualifying event described in paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (e) has occurred.

(c) A postponement of an application deadline granted by the commission pursuant to this section shall apply to all financial aid applicants within the school district, community college district, or the area or region, such as a city or county, that was predominantly affected by the qualifying event.

(d) For purposes of this section, the commission may, on a permanent basis, delegate to the director of the commission the authority to grant a deadline postponement authorized by this section.

(e) For purposes of this section, a “qualifying event” is any event or extenuating circumstance outside of the control of the pupils or students in an affected school district, community college district, or area or region that has had an adverse effect on the ability of students within the district to successfully complete and submit their financial aid applications by an established statutory deadline. The qualifying event shall have occurred or been ongoing during the period for which financial aid applications were available to submit for the following academic year, and includes, but is not limited to, any of the following types of events:

(1) A natural disaster.

(2) A state of emergency declared by the Governor or the President of the United States.

(3) A delay in the opening of the Free Application for Federal Student Aid, as declared by the commission.

(4) A labor action.

(f) The commission may establish procedures, which may include a standardized application form, through which a postponement of an application deadline may be requested by the individuals referenced in subdivision (a). The formal application to the commission shall be submitted no later than 15 business days after the occurrence of the qualifying event in question, or, if the qualifying event is
 ongoing, no later than 15 business days after the conclusion of the qualifying event, and shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) A description of the qualifying event that is the basis for the request, including how the event in question has had an adverse effect on students’ ability to submit their financial aid applications by the established deadline.

(2) A list of any financial aid outreach events, including, but not limited to, workshops or webinars sponsored by the commission, that have been canceled or delayed due to the qualifying event.

(3) When available, data showing that there has been, or is likely to be, a reduction in the number of students who have completed a financial aid application from the previous year.

(g) If the
 commission grants the postponement of an application deadline pursuant to this section, the commission shall issue a written notice of the postponement of the deadline within 48 hours of granting the postponement of the deadline. The notice shall include the approved postponed deadline, and shall be sent to all of the following or their respective designees:

(1) The individual who requested the extension pursuant to subdivision (a), if applicable.

(2) The Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(3) The Governor.

(4) The Director of Finance.

(5) The President of the University of California.

(6) The Chancellor of the California
 State University.

(7) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(8) The Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature.

(h) When granting a postponement of an application deadline pursuant to this section, the commission shall post all of the following on its internet website:

(1) The approved postponed deadline.

(2) The public school district, community college district, or area or region, such as a city or county, to which the approved postponed deadline applies.

(i) The authority to grant postponements of application deadlines established
 pursuant to this section shall apply to all of the following programs established in statute, and any other state-funded financial aid programs administered by the commission pursuant to this part:

(1) The Cal Grant A Entitlement program established by Article 2 (commencing with Section 69434) of Chapter 1.7.

(2) The Cal Grant B Entitlement program established by Article 3 (commencing with Section 69435) of Chapter 1.7.

(3) The California Community College Transfer Cal Grant Entitlement Program established by Article 4 (commencing with Section 69436) of Chapter 1.7.

(4) The Competitive Cal Grant A and B Awards program established by Article 5 (commencing with Section 69437) of Chapter 1.7.

(5) The Middle Class Scholarship Program established by Article 22 (commencing with Section 70020).

(j) Commission staff shall annually report all of the following information to the commission, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the chairpersons of the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature:

(1) The total number of deadline postponement requests that were granted pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) The total number of statewide financial aid applications received after the established application deadline.

(3) The specific school districts, community college districts, or areas or regions within the state that received approval to submit a delayed financial aid application pursuant to subdivision (a).

(4) Information regarding whether approved deadline postponements due to a natural disaster or state of emergency were made equally available to financial aid applicants across the impacted area or region.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 31, Sec. 1.   (AB 313)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

69513.5.

In no event shall the director of the commission, any employee of the commission, or any individual retained by the commission serve as chairperson or a member of an advisory committee of the commission. This prohibition shall include, but not be limited to, all advisory committees established by statute and all advisory committees established by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 268, Sec. 16.38.   Effective June 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

69514.

The commission shall do all of the following:

(a) Report, on or before April 1 of each year, statistical data examining the impact and effectiveness of state-funded programs. The commission shall use common criteria in determining the impact of these programs, and shall have the authority to obtain any data from postsecondary educational institutions necessary for the reports. To the extent practicable, this report shall specifically note the number and the demographic characteristics of the students who qualify for a Cal Grant award based on obtaining high school graduation or its equivalent pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 69433.9.

(b) Collect and disseminate data concerning the financial resources and needs of students and potential students, and the scope and impact of existing state, federal, and institutional student aid programs.

(c) Report, on or before April 1 of each year, the aggregate financial need of individuals seeking access to postsecondary education and the degree to which current student aid programs meet this legitimate financial need.

(d) Develop and report annually the distribution of funds and awards among income groups, ethnic groups, grade point average levels, and postsecondary education segments.

(e) Prepare and disseminate information regarding the criteria
 used in distributing available student aid funds.

(f) Be authorized to expend funds for the purpose of disseminating information about all institutional, state, and federal student aid programs to potential applicants. This distribution of information shall primarily focus on potential applicants with the greatest financial need.

(g) In the event that the Financial Aid Shopping Sheet developed by the United States Department of Education is no longer available, develop, in consultation with the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, a similar form that a postsecondary educational institution subject to the requirements of either Section 66021.3 or 94912.5 shall use. The form shall provide students and their families with information, including, but not necessarily
 limited to, grant and scholarship opportunities and net costs associated with attendance at an institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 648, Sec. 4.   (SB 67)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

69514.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the commission may receive donations, bequests, grants, and philanthropic funding, subject to conditions or restrictions that the executive director of the commission may deem advisable, and subject to the approval of the Director of Finance as provided in Section 11005 of the Government Code.

(b) Beginning January 1, 2024, at the first regular commission meeting of the calendar year, the commission shall publicly report both of the following:

(1) The source, and the amount from each source, of any philanthropic funding received during the calendar year immediately preceding the reporting deadline.

(2) The purpose for which that philanthropic funding was used.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 187, Sec. 1.   (AB 2286)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

69514.5.

(a) The Community College Student Financial Aid Outreach Program is hereby established. The commission shall, in consultation with the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, develop and administer this program for the purpose of providing financial aid training to high school and community college counselors and advisers who work with students planning to attend or attending a community college. This training shall also address the specific needs of all of the following:

(1) Community college students intending to transfer to a four-year institution of higher education.

(2) Foster youth and former foster youth, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 66025.9.

(3) Homeless
 youth and former homeless youth, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 66025.9.

(4) Students with disabilities.

(b) The program shall provide specialized information on financial aid opportunities available to community college students, with a particular focus on students who plan to transfer to a four-year college or university. The commission shall work in collaboration with the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and other segments of higher education to develop and distribute this specialized information to assist community college students who are planning to transfer to a four-year college or university. Each year, the program shall offer financial aid workshops for high school and community college counselors, targeted for students planning to attend a community college or to transfer from a community college to a
 four-year institution of higher education. The program shall assist community college counselors in conducting student and family workshops that provide general information about financial aid and technical assistance in completing financial aid forms.

(c) The program shall concentrate its efforts on high schools and community colleges that are located in geographic areas that have a high percentage of low-income families.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 163, Sec. 3.   (AB 806)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

69515.

As used in this division, “commission” means the Student Aid Commission created by this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1113, Sec. 9.5.)
-------------------------------------------

69515.5.

(a) The commission may enter into an agreement with a public agency of a state other than California, or a private entity related to an agency of another state, to assist the other agency or entity in implementing student financial aid programs, including providing assistance with processing grants, fellowships, and loans through the use of automated information systems. The commission may receive payment, reimbursement, or other resources as consideration for services provided pursuant to agreements entered into under this section.

(b) The commission shall establish fees for services it provides pursuant to this section in order to recover, at a minimum, the full costs of providing those services,
 including all direct and indirect costs.

(c) The Financial Aid Technical Assistance Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury, and moneys in the fund shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature to the commission, for the direct and indirect costs of providing assistance to agencies and entities of other states with implementation of Dream Act programs and to improve financial aid services for California. The commission shall deposit the proceeds of the fees established under this section into the fund. Only the moneys received for purposes of this section shall be deposited into the fund. The fund shall be credited with all of the investment income earned by the moneys deposited in the fund. Moneys in the fund are not part of the General Fund as defined in Section 16300 of the Government Code.

(d) The commission shall use moneys deposited in the fund for all costs
 associated with providing technical assistance to agencies of states other than California, and related private entities, pursuant to this section, and moneys remaining in the fund after those costs are retired shall be used to improve student financial aid services for California. Prior to the expenditure of these residual funds, the commission shall submit a detailed expenditure plan for approval by the Department of Finance as part of the annual budget process.

(e) Beginning October 1, 2014, the commission shall submit an annual report to the Department of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee detailing the total revenues collected in the fund, by service provided and applicable fee collected, and the use of the moneys in the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 50, Sec. 1.   (AB 94)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

69516.

The commission shall work cooperatively with the State Department of Social Services to develop an automated system to verify a student’s status as a foster youth to aid in the processing of applications for federal financial aid.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 722, Sec. 1.   (SB 12)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

69517.

(a) The Student Aid Commission, in consultation with an advisory committee of students and representatives of postsecondary institutions, may make adjustments to award selection procedures and selection criteria. In determining adjustments, the commission shall consider at least all of the following factors: 

(1) The impact of the adjustments on the distribution of funds and awards among income groups, ethnic groups, and grade point average levels.

(2) The impact of the adjustments on the distribution of funds and awards among postsecondary education segments.

(3) The costs of implementing proposed adjustments.

(4) The availability of financial aid from other sources for students who qualify for an award.

(b) The commission may also consider the impact of inflation in the proposed adjustments pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) In proposing changes to the procedures and criteria for award selection that would result in a substantive change in the recipient population, the commission shall submit the proposed changes for public review and comment in accordance with procedures established in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1113, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

69517.5.

The Student Aid Commission shall, with the assistance of the Attorney General’s office, seek refunds on any awards to students made under this part that resulted from the student or his or her parents, or both, reporting information concerning their status incorrectly, with the incorrect information leading to the establishment of the student’s financial eligibility to receive an award.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 43, Sec. 4.   Effective June 26, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

69518.

(a) By September 15 of each fiscal year, the Student Aid Commission shall submit budget change proposals to the Department of Finance for inclusion in the Governor’s Budget prepared pursuant to Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution.

(b) The budget change proposals submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include, but not be limited to, an analysis of the impact of any proposed adjustments in the distribution of funds and awards.

(c) Any supporting materials prepared for the Student Aid Commission’s consideration and public review and comment pursuant to this section, including, when it becomes available, data pertaining to the impact of any proposed adjustments on the distribution of funds and awards among income groups, ethnic groups, grade point average levels, and postsecondary education segments, shall be incorporated within the expenditure plan.

(d) If the Student Aid Commission proposes, in its budget change proposals, adjustments to the maximum grant, number of grants, and the income ceiling for grant awards made pursuant to Section 69532, at least the following factors shall be considered in determining the appropriate adjustments:

(1) The impact of inflation.

(2) The availability of financial aid from other sources for students who would qualify for a grant award.

(3) Any changes in the level of educational support provided to students at public colleges and universities in the state.

(4) The impact of proposed adjustments in the maximum grant and in the income ceiling upon the utilization of public and private postsecondary educational institutions.

(5) The number of applicants eligible to receive an award in the previous year who did not receive an award in the previous year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1113, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

69519.
